Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Alternative programs. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the Minnesota Association of Alternative Programs STARS (Success, Teamwork, Achievement, Recognition, and Self-esteem) program to help students in alternative programs develop employment, academic, and social skills and to support student participation in trainings and conferences: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 55,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 55,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The base for fiscal year 2028 and later is $55,000. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end